Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1680.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 272.02, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 106. new text end new text begin Agricultural riparian buffer. new text end new text begin (a) A riparian buffer or buffer, as defined in section 103F.48, that is located on class 2a and 2b property under section 273.13, subdivision 23, is exempt, provided that the landowner is in compliance with the requirements of section 103F.48. new text end new text begin (b) A taxpayer requesting exemption of all or a portion of any real property used as a riparian buffer must submit an application to the county assessor. The commissioner of revenue, in consultation with the Board of Water and Soil Resources, must prescribe the form and manner of the application. The county assessor and local soil and water conservation district must determine the portion of the parcel that contains a riparian buffer under section 103F.48. The local soil and water conservation district must certify eligible land to the county by November 15 of the year prior to each assessment year. A local soil and water conservation district must annually notify the county assessor of any landowner who is not in compliance with the requirements of section 103F.48. If a landowner is no longer in compliance with the requirements of this subdivision, the county assessor must remove the exemption on the next January 2 assessment date. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective beginning with assessment year 2026 and thereafter. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [272.0214] AGRICULTURAL RIPARIAN BUFFER EXEMPTION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Certification. new text end new text begin For land qualifying for an exemption under section 272.02, subdivision 106, the county auditor must certify to the commissioner of revenue the information necessary for the commissioner to determine the reimbursements made under subdivision 3. The county auditor must certify the information for each taxes payable year as part of the data required under section 270C.85, subdivision 2. The county auditor must also certify any prior-year adjustments as part of the data required under section 270C.85, subdivision 2. The commissioner must review the certifications for accuracy and may make any changes deemed necessary or return the certification to the county auditor for correction. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Calculation. new text end new text begin The commissioner of revenue shall calculate the reimbursement amounts attributable to the exemption under section 272.02, subdivision 106, for each local taxing district based on the information certified under subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Payment. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of revenue shall reimburse each local taxing jurisdiction, other than school districts, for the gross property tax amount attributed to the exemption under section 272.02, subdivision 106, in two equal installments on October 31 and December 26 of the taxes payable year for which the exemptions are granted, including in each payment the prior-year adjustments certified under section 270C.85, subdivision 2, for that taxes payable year. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of revenue shall certify the total of the reimbursements attributed to the exemption under section 272.02, subdivision 106, for each taxes payable year within each school district to the commissioner of education. The commissioner of education must pay the reimbursement amounts to each school district as provided in section 273.1392. new text end new text begin (c) The reimbursement to each local taxing jurisdiction under this subdivision must be equal to the reduction in gross property tax payable to each local taxing jurisdiction resulting from the exemption under section 272.02, subdivision 106. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin An amount sufficient to make the payments required by this section to taxing jurisdictions other than school districts is annually appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue. An amount sufficient to make the payments required by this section for school districts is annually appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of education. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective beginning with assessment year 2026 and thereafter. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 273.1392, is amended to read: 273.1392 PAYMENT; SCHOOL DISTRICTS. The amounts of new text begin agricultural riparian buffer reimbursements under section 272.0214; new text end bovine tuberculosis credit reimbursements under section 273.113; conservation tax credits under section 273.119; disaster or emergency reimbursement under sections 273.1231 to 273.1235; agricultural credits under sections 273.1384 and 273.1387; aids and credits under section 273.1398; enterprise zone property credit payments under section 469.171; metropolitan agricultural preserve reduction under section 473H.10; and electric generation transition aid under section 477A.24 for school districts, shall be certified to the Department of Education by the Department of Revenue. The amounts so certified shall be paid according to section 127A.45, subdivisions 9, 10, and 13. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective beginning with fiscal year 2027. new text end